Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 33. Williamsburg Area Transit Authority.

§ 33.2-3300.
Authority created.

There is hereby created a political subdivision of the Commonwealth known as the Williamsburg Area Transit Authority, hereinafter known as “the Authority.”

In addition to such other powers vested in the Authority by this chapter, the Authority shall have the following powers and functions:

The Authority shall prepare a regional transit plan for all or a portion of the areas located within the jurisdictional boundaries of each member locality. The regional transit plan may include all or portions of those areas within the City of Williamsburg, the County of James City and such portions of York County as its governing body desires to have covered, and the areas owned or operated by the College of William and Mary in Virginia and the Colonial Williamsburg Foundation, including transit improvements of regional significance, and those improvements necessary or incidental thereto, and the Authority shall from time to time revise and amend the plan.

The Authority may, when a transit plan is adopted according to subdivision 1, construct or acquire, by purchase, lease, contract, or otherwise, the transit facilities specified in such transit plan.

The Authority may enter into agreements or leases with public or private entities for the operation of its facilities, or may operate such facilities itself.

The Authority may enter into contracts or agreements with the counties and cities embraced by the Authority, with other transit commissions of transportation districts adjoining any county or city embraced by the Authority, with any transportation authority, or with any state, local, private, or federal entity to provide, or cause to be provided, transit facilities and services to the area embraced by the Authority. Such contracts or agreements, together with any agreements or leases for the operation of such facilities, may be used by the Authority to finance the construction and operation of transit facilities, and such contracts, agreements, or leases shall inure to the benefit of any creditor of the Authority.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Authority may:

Acquire land or any interest therein by purchase, lease, or gift and provide transit facilities thereon for use in connection with any transit service;

Acquire land or any interest therein by purchase, lease, or gift in advance of the need for sale or contribution to an agency, for use by that agency in connection with an adopted transit plan; or

Prepare a plan for mass transit services with persons, cities, counties, agencies, authorities, or transportation commissions and may further contract with any such person or other entity to provide necessary facilities, equipment, operations and maintenance, access, and insurance pursuant to such plan.

History.

2006, c. 179, § 15.2-6801; 2015, c. 256.

Editor’s note.

Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Acts 2015, c. 256, cl. 2 provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, or contents of any section of Chapter 68 (§

15.2-6800

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 33.2 or any other title of the Code of Virginia and whenever any such former section is given a new number in Title 33.2 or any other title of the Code of Virginia, all references to any such former section of Chapter 68 (§

15.2-6800

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia or any other title of the Code of Virginia shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions thereof.”

Acts 2015, c. 256, cl. 3 provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Chapter 68 (§

15.2-6800

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2015, c. 256, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to this act so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2015 Session of the General Assembly amending Chapter 68 (§

15.2-6800

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2015, c. 256, cl. 5 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 68 (§

15.2-6800

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia effective as of July 1, 2015 shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that date. Except as otherwise provided in this act, the repeal of Chapter 68 (§

15.2-6800

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to offenses committed prior to July 1, 2015, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purpose of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to July 1, 2015, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2015, c. 256, cl. 6 provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before July 1, 2015, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Chapter 68 (§

15.2-6800

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts 2015, c. 256, cl. 7 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 68 (§

15.2-6800

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any loan agreement or other contract, or any right established or accrued under such loan agreement or contract, that existed prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2015, c. 256, cl. 8 provides: “That the repeal of Chapter 68 (§

15.2-6800

et seq.) of Title 15.2 of the Code of Virginia shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any bond or other debt obligation authorized, issued, or outstanding prior to such repeal.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “The College of William and Mary in Virginia” was substituted for “The College of William and Mary” in subdivision 1 to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

§ 33.2-3301.
Counties and cities embraced by the Authority.

Upon adoption of an approving ordinance by each of the respective governing bodies wishing to join the Authority, the Authority shall embrace the County of James City, such portions of York County as its governing body desires to have covered, and the City of Williamsburg.

History.

2006, c. 179, § 15.2-6802; 2015, c. 256.

§ 33.2-3302.
Composition of Authority; membership; terms.

Upon adoption of an approving ordinance by each of the respective governing bodies wishing to join the Authority, the Authority may consist of up to seven members as follows:

Two members representing James City County;

One member representing York County; and

One member representing the City of Williamsburg.

In addition, the county and municipal corporation members may elect up to three additional members to represent the interests of higher-education facilities and private, nonprofit tourist-driven agencies in the Williamsburg area, provided that such member facilities and organizations contribute significant financial resources to the Authority.

The Authority shall appoint the chairman and vice-chairman.

History.

2006, c. 179, § 15.2-6803; 2015, c. 256.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 256, cl. 11 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the existing terms of persons currently serving as members of any agency, board, authority, commission, or other entity and that appointees currently holding positions shall maintain their terms of appointment and continue to serve until such time as the existing terms might expire or become renewed. However, any new appointments made on or after July 1, 2015, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

§ 33.2-3303.
Staff.

The Authority shall employ an executive director and such staff as it deems necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities under this chapter. No such person shall contemporaneously serve as a member of the Authority. The Department of Transportation and the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall make their employees available to assist the Authority, upon request.

History.

2006, c. 179, § 15.2-6804; 2015, c. 256.

§ 33.2-3304.
Decisions of Authority.

A majority of the members of the Authority shall constitute a quorum. Decisions of the Authority shall require a quorum and shall be in accordance with voting procedures established by the Authority.

History.

2006, c. 179, § 15.2-6805; 2015, c. 256.

§ 33.2-3305.
Allocation of certain Authority expenses among component members.

The administrative expenses of the Authority, as provided in an annual budget adopted by the Authority, to the extent funds for such expenses are not provided from other sources, shall be allocated among the component counties, city, and educational and nonprofit agencies pursuant to a funding formula as duly adopted by the Authority.

History.

2006, c. 179, § 15.2-6806; 2015, c. 256.

§ 33.2-3306.
Payment to members of Authority.

The members of the Authority may be paid for their services compensation in either (i) the amount provided in the general appropriation act for members of the General Assembly engaged in legislative business between sessions or (ii) a lesser amount as determined by the Authority. Members may be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

, if approved by the Authority. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Authority.

History.

2006, c. 179, § 15.2-6807; 2015, c. 256.

§ 33.2-3307.
Formation of advisory committees.

The Authority may, in its discretion, form advisory committees to assist the Authority.

History.

2006, c. 179, § 15.2-6808; 2015, c. 256.

§ 33.2-3308.
Other duties and responsibilities of Authority.

In addition to other powers herein granted, the Authority shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

General oversight of Williamsburg area programs involving mass transit or congestion mitigation;

Long-range transit planning in the Williamsburg area, both financially constrained and financially unconstrained;

Recommending to state, regional, and federal agencies regional transit priorities, including public-private transit projects and funding allocations;

Allocating to priority regional transit projects any funds made available to the Authority and, at the discretion of the Authority, directly overseeing such projects;

Recommending to the Commonwealth Transportation Board priority regional transit projects for receipt of federal and state funds;

Serving as an advocate for the transit needs of the Williamsburg area before the state and federal governments;

Applying to and negotiating with the government of the United States, the Commonwealth, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, for grants and any other funds available to carry out the purposes of this chapter and receiving, holding, accepting, and administering from any source gifts, bequests, grants, aid, or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied to carry out the purposes of this chapter subject, however, to any conditions upon which gifts, bequests, grants, aid, or contributions are made. Unless otherwise restricted by the terms of the gift, bequest, or grant, the Authority may sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of such money, securities, or other property given or bequeathed to it in furtherance of its purposes.

History.

2006, c. 179, § 15.2-6809; 2015, c. 256.